Utah statutes.
17B-1-640.   Independent audits required.

(1)  Independent audits of all local districts are required to be performed in conformity with Title 51, Chapter 2a, Accounting Reports from Political Subdivisions, Interlocal Organizations, and Other Local Entities Act.

(2)  The board of trustees shall appoint an independent auditor for the purpose of complying with the requirements of this section and with Title 51, Chapter 2a, Accounting Reports from Political Subdivisions, Interlocal Organizations, and Other Local Entities Act.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

